California statutes. Education Code
Any person employed by a district in a position requiring certification qualifications who serves less than the minimum schoolday as defined in Sections 46112 to 46116, inclusive, or 46141 may specifically contract to serve as a part-time employee. In fixing the compensation of part-time employees, governing boards shall provide an amount which bears the same ratio to the amount provided full-time employees as the time actually served by such part-time employees bears to the time actually served by full-time employees of the same grade or assignment. This section shall not apply to any person classified as a temporary employee under Sections 44919 and 44888, or any person employed as a part-time employee above and beyond his employment as a full-time employee in the same school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45028.

(a) (1) Effective July 1, 1970, each person employed by a school district in a position requiring certification qualifications, except a person employed in a position requiring administrative or supervisory credentials, shall be classified on the salary schedule on the basis of uniform allowance for years of training and years of experience, except if a public school employer and the exclusive representative negotiate and mutually agree to a salary schedule based on criteria other than a uniform allowance for years of training and years of experience pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of the Government Code. Employees shall not be placed in different classifications on the schedule, nor paid different salaries, solely on the basis of the respective grade levels in which such employees serve.

(2) In no case shall the governing board of a school district draw orders for the salary of any teacher in violation of this section, nor shall any superintendent draw any requisition for the salary of any teacher in violation thereof.

(3) This section shall not apply to teachers of special day and evening classes in elementary schools, teachers of special classes for elementary pupils, teachers of special day and evening high school classes and substitute teachers.

(b) (1) It is not a violation of the uniformity requirement of this section for a school district, with the agreement of the exclusive representative of certificated employees, if any, to grant any employee hired after a locally specified date differential credit for prior years of experience or prior units of credit for purposes of initial placement on the salary schedule of the district.

(2) This subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(c) A public school employer and the exclusive representative of credentialed teachers may jointly apply to the Superintendent for technical assistance and planning grant funding to facilitate the planning of a salary schedule for teachers based on criteria in addition to years of training and years of experience, as described in subdivision (a). The Superintendent may make planning grants from funds appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or other legislation.

(d) To be eligible for grant funding pursuant to subdivision (c), the public school employer and the exclusive representative of credentialed teachers should consider a salary schedule designed to compensate teachers for the additional responsibilities, time, and effort required to serve in challenging school settings, and reward teachers for professional growth tied to their particular assignments.

(e) Public school employers and exclusive representatives of credentialed teachers are encouraged to recognize teacher contributions to improving pupil achievement, provide incentives to teachers to accept teaching assignments in areas of highest need, and recognize relevant professional experience on the salary schedule in lieu of units and degrees or in lieu of teaching experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 517, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

45029.

Teachers in an opportunity school or opportunity classes shall be paid in the same manner as in other elementary schools of the city, city and county, or the school district in which the opportunity school or opportunity classes are situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45030.

The governing board of any school district may employ such substitute employees of the district as it deems necessary and shall adopt and make public a salary schedule setting the daily or pay period rate or rates for substitute employees.

This section shall not be construed as modifying or repealing any law fixing a minimum annual salary for employees of district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45031.

The salaries of home teachers shall be paid from the city or district special school funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45032.

The governing board of a school district may at any time during any school year increase the salaries of persons employed by the district in positions requiring certification qualifications, such increase to be effective on any date ordered by the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45033.

The governing board of any school district shall not decrease the annual salary of a person employed by the district in a position requiring certification qualifications for failure to meet any requirement of the district that such person complete additional educational units, course of study, or work in any college or university or any equivalent thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45034.

No order for a warrant, and no warrant drawn pursuant to Section 42647, shall be drawn in favor of any person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications, unless such person is at the time the holder of a proper certification document in full force for the full time for which the requisition or warrant, as the case may be, is drawn, and on file or registered as required by law at the time and unless he is employed by the governing board of the unified school district, or district with over 10,000 average daily attendance or by the county superintendent of schools as provided in this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45035.

If any school district fails to pay the salary of any person employed by it in a position requiring certification qualifications who has on file a contract of employment held valid by the legal adviser of the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district, such county superintendent of schools may transfer sufficient money from the funds of the district to the county school service fund and pay such salary from such fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45036.

(a) Whenever, on or after September 15, 1961, a person has rendered service in a position requiring certification qualifications, or the governing board of a school district has employed a person in a position requiring certification qualifications, or the county superintendent of schools has drawn an order for a warrant in favor of a person in a position requiring certification qualifications, for a period of service during which the person did not have a valid credential required for that position in force as required by law, and when as a result of that the employment of the person to render that service, the rendering of that service, the inclusion of the attendance of pupils taught by the person in the average daily attendance of the school district, or the drawing of the order
 warrant for the service of that person, is in violation of Section 46300, 44830, 45034, or any other provision of this code, that employment, rendering of service, inclusion of attendance, or drawing of the order for the warrant shall be deemed fully legal for all purposes if the commission approves the rendering of the service in accordance with this section.

 (b) The commission shall adopt rules and regulations to establish procedures for a review in these cases and shall determine whether the rendering of the service shall be approved and made fully legal for all purposes. If the commission gives its approval to the rendering of the service, then the employment, inclusion of attendance, and drawing of the order for the warrant shall be automatically approved and made fully legal for all purposes.

(c) The commission shall not approve of the rendering of the service unless it
 determines that the person rendering the service had, in fact, the necessary qualifications, during the period of service in question, for the credential required by law for the position in which the service was rendered, and unless a valid credential required for the position has been issued to the person before the review and action by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 23.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

45037.

(a) Except as provided in Section 45036, for a fiscal year in which a person renders service as a teacher in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, who does not have a valid credential or certification document, as those terms are defined in Sections 44002 and 44007, the school district, county office of education, or charter school that the person is employed by shall be assessed a penalty that shall be calculated as provided in subdivision (b) and withheld from state funding otherwise due to the school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(1) Notwithstanding Sections 46300 and 47612.5, the attendance of the noncertificated person’s pupils during the period of service shall be included in the computation of average daily attendance.

(2) The noncertificated person’s period of service shall not be excluded from the determination of eligibility for instruction time pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 46200) of Chapter 2 of Part 26 of Division 4, or, for a charter school, pursuant to Section 47612.5.

(b) (1) For each person who rendered service in the employment of the school district, county office of education, or charter school as a teacher in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, during the fiscal year, add the total number of schooldays on which the person rendered any amount of the service.

(2) For each person who rendered service in the employment of the school district, county office of education, or charter school as a teacher in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, during the fiscal year, for a period of service during which the person did not have a valid certification document, add the number of schooldays on which the person rendered any amount of the service without a valid certification document.

(3) Divide the number determined in paragraph (2) by the
 number determined in paragraph (1) and carry the result to four decimal places.

(4) Multiply a school district’s or charter school’s local control funding formula grant apportionment for the fiscal year, calculated pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, or a county office of education’s local control funding formula alternative education grant computed pursuant to Section 2574, as apportioned pursuant to Section 2575, for the fiscal year, for the program in which the noncertificated person rendered service by the number determined in paragraph (3).

(c) If a county office of education releases a warrant in favor of a person for whom a period of school district service is included in the calculation set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and the warrant is either compensation for employment as a teacher or for employment in some other capacity if
 the county office of education has direct knowledge or is in possession of information giving rise to a reasonable inference that the person is rendering service as a teacher, the county office of education shall be assessed a penalty. The penalty assessed to a county office of education for any fiscal year in which one or more school district teachers did not have a valid certification document shall be equal to the lesser of three amounts as follows:

(1) Fifty percent of all penalties assessed for that fiscal year to all school districts in the county office of education’s jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) One-half percent of the total expenditures for that fiscal year from unrestricted resources, as defined in the California School Accounting Manual, in the county office of education’s county school service fund, when two or fewer school districts in the county
 office of education’s jurisdiction are subject to penalties pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) One percent of the total expenditures for that fiscal year from unrestricted resources, as defined in the California School Accounting Manual, in the county office of education’s county school service fund, when three or more school districts in the county office of education’s jurisdiction are subject to penalties pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Except as provided in Section 41344.1, nothing in this section may be waived in whole or in part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 608, Sec. 4.   (AB 2467)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

45038.

(a) The governing board of a school district or charter school may arrange to pay the persons in positions requiring certification qualifications employed by it, or any one or more of those employees or one or more groups or categories of those employees, in either 10, 11, or 12 equal payments instead of by the school month.

 (b) In lieu of the arrangement in subdivision (a), orders for the payment of salary, and payroll orders for the payment of salary and warrants for the payment of salary of employees employed in positions requiring certification qualifications may be drawn once each two weeks, twice a month, or once each four weeks as determined by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   Effective October 12, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

45039.

If the governing board of a school district or charter school arranges to pay persons employed by it in 12 equal payments for the year, it may pay each monthly installment at the end of each calendar month, whether or not the persons are actually engaged in teaching during the month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 524, Sec. 2.   Effective October 12, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

45040.

(a) The governing board of a school district or charter school not paying the annual salaries of persons employed by the district or charter school in 12 equal monthly payments may withhold from each payment made to each employee an amount equal to 1623 percent thereof.

(b) The total of the amounts deducted from the salary of an employee during a school year shall be paid to him or her in two equal installments, one installment to be paid not later than the fifth day of August next succeeding, and one installment to be paid not later than the fifth day of September next succeeding.

(c) If an employee leaves the service of the district or charter school by death or otherwise before receiving the moneys that may be due him or her, the amount due him or her shall be paid within 30 days to him or her or to any other person entitled to those moneys by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 524, Sec. 3.   Effective October 12, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

45041.

A person in a position requiring certification qualifications who serves less than a full school year shall receive as salary only an amount that bears the same ratio to the established annual salary for the position as the number of working days he serves bears to the total number of working days plus institutes in the annual school term, and any other day when the employee is required by the governing board to be present at the schools of the district. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, a person in a position requiring certification qualifications who serves a complete semester shall receive not less than one-half of the established annual salary for the position. This section shall not be so construed as to prevent the payment of compensation to a person while on leave of absence when the payment of the compensation is authorized by law.

In the event any such person dies during the school year, his estate shall be entitled to receive, as salary owed to the decedent, an amount that bears the same ratio to the established annual salary for the position as the number of working days he served bears to the total number of working days plus institutes in the annual school term, and any other day when the employee was required by the governing board to be present at the schools of the district, less any salary paid to the decedent prior to his death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45042.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 45041, the governing board of a school district may adopt an alternative method of computing the salary received by a person requiring certification qualifications who serves less than a full school year.

Such method shall include the deduction from the employee’s regular salary of only that amount actually paid to a substitute or, if a substitute is not employed, the amount which would have been paid to a substitute had a substitute been employed.

For the purposes of this section, the amount which would have been paid to a substitute is that amount established by the district in a published salary schedule for substitute employees.

Such alternative method shall only be applied upon authorization by the school board based upon individual employee application and shall be limited to no more than five days per school year for each employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45043.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 45041 or any other provision of law to the contrary, if a person is employed by a school district in a position requiring certification qualifications at the beginning of the second semester of a school year for services during that semester, the compensation of such employee shall be not less than one-half of the annual compensation for that position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45044.

Whenever a salary schedule increasing the salaries of its certificated employees is adopted by a school district to be effective at the commencement of the second semester of a school year:

(a) The compensation of such employees shall not exceed one-half of the annual compensation for their positions under the former salary schedule for services during the first semester.

(b) The compensation of such employees shall not be less than one-half of the annual compensation for their positions under the newly adopted salary schedule for services during the second semester.

This section shall not be construed to limit the time at which any salary increase ordered by the governing board shall become effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45045.

When a school district operates on a year-round schedule pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 37600) of Part 22 of this division, the salary of an employee who is employed for the extended school year and who previously had been assigned to a 9- or 10-month teaching position in the same district shall be adjusted in accordance with the ratio of the extension in the number of days expected to be taught by said employee to the number of days expected to be taught by employees in the district in the school year prior to the commencement of year-round operation.

A full-time probationary or permanent classroom teacher currently employed by a school district which converts to a continuous school program shall not, without his written consent, be required to teach under such program more than 180 days during a school year, or more than the number of days the schools of the district were maintained during the year preceding implementation of the continuous school program, whichever is the greater. This section shall not be construed as limiting the power of school district governing boards to govern the schools of the district, including the assignment of teachers employed by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45046.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 45045, the governing board of a school district in which a continuous school program is in operation pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 37600) of Part 22 of this division, but in fewer than all of the schools in the district or with fewer than all of the certificated employees participating therein, and in which revised salary schedules become effective on a date other than July 1, may adjust the salaries of certificated employees participating in the continuous school program so that the total amount payable to each such employee in a school year does not differ from the salary which would be payable to him over such a period if he were not participating in the program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45047.

Service on a commission on professional competence pursuant to Section 44944, in the employing school district or in some other district, by a person employed by a district in a position requiring certification qualifications shall not be considered time off job with respect to Section 45041. Neither the amount paid to a substitute required to be hired to replace such a person serving on a commission on professional competence pursuant to Section 44945 in the employing school district or in some other district nor the amount which would have been paid to a substitute had a substitute been employed, shall be deducted from the person’s salary pursuant to Section 45042.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45048.

(a) Each salary payment for any calendar month may be made on the last working day of the month and shall be paid not earlier than the last working day of the month and not later than the fifth day of the succeeding calendar month except that teachers employed for less than full time in classes for adults, in a day or evening high school, or in a special day or evening class maintained in connection with an elementary school shall be paid on or before the 10th day of the succeeding calendar month for services performed during the preceding calendar month.

(b) If the school district provides for the payment of the salary of employees employed in positions requiring certification qualifications once each two weeks, twice a month, or once each four weeks, pursuant to Section 45038, each salary payment may be made on the last working day of the regular payroll period and shall be made not earlier than the last working day of the regular payroll period and not later than the eighth working day of the following regular payroll period.

(c) If a salary payment is not made timely as required by this section, the amount of the salary payment due shall be increased by an amount of interest on the unpaid amount for each day of delay.

(d) A certificated employee of a school district who qualifies for a salary increase shall be paid the increased salary not later than three regular pay periods or three months, whichever is longer, after the employee files proper documentation where required for the salary increase. The district shall additionally pay the employee daily interest on the amount owed to the employee calculated from the date that the employee was entitled to the salary increase if the school district does not pay the employee his or her salary increase within three regular pay periods or three months, whichever period is longer, after the employee files proper documentation where required for the salary increase. All amounts due the employee resulting from the salary increase and not paid to the employee at the time that the employee actually receives the salary increase shall be paid to the employee within 20 business days of the date that the employee actually received the salary increase. The district shall additionally pay the employee daily interest on the amount owed to the employee calculated from the date that the employee was entitled to the salary increase if the district does not pay the employee all amounts due the employee resulting from the salary increase within 20 business days following the date that the employee actually received the salary increase.

(e) The amount of interest required by subdivisions (c) and (d) shall be determined by the method established in Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) This section shall not prohibit a school district from making a payment of earned salary before the last working day of the month or regular payroll period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 287, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45049.

(a) When any school district employs a certificated employee to perform teaching or other services in addition to his or her regular teaching duties, or when a school district employs a certificated employee to perform teaching or other services at a summer school maintained by the district, the district shall pay the employee for the services either in one lump sum or at an hourly, daily, biweekly, quadriweekly, or monthly rate of pay. If the pay is in one lump sum, the district shall pay the employee within 10 days after the termination of the services. If the pay is at an hourly, daily, biweekly, quadriweekly or monthly rate, the district shall pay the employee within 10 days after the end of each calendar month or regular pay period during which the services are performed.

(b) If a salary payment is not made timely as required by this section, the amount of the salary payment due shall be increased by an amount of interest on the unpaid amount for each day of delay.

(c) A certificated employee of a school district who qualifies for a salary increase shall be paid the increased salary not later than three regular pay periods or three months, whichever is longer, after the employee files proper documentation where required for the salary increase. The district shall additionally pay the employee daily interest on the amount owed to the employee calculated from the date that the employee was entitled to the salary increase if the school district does not pay the employee his or her salary increase within three regular pay periods or three months, whichever is longer, after the employee files proper documentation where required for the salary increase. All amounts due the employee resulting from the salary increase and not paid to the employee at the time that the employee actually receives the salary increase shall be paid to the employee within 20 business days of the date that the employee actually received the salary increase. The district shall additionally pay the employee daily interest on the amount owed to the employee calculated from the date that the employee was entitled to the salary increase if the district does not pay the employee all amounts due the employee resulting from the salary increase within 20 business days following the date that the employee actually received the salary increase.

(d) The amount of interest required by subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be determined by the method established in Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 287, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45050.

Instead of issuing a single warrant to each employee for salary or wages the district may use a payroll form of warrant making payment to two or more employees on one payroll warrant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45051.

When the payroll form of warrant is used, the approved and allowed payroll warrant shall be deposited with the county treasurer, who shall make payment to the employee or his order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45052.

When the payroll form of warrant is used the name of each employee shall be listed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45055.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, no warrant shall be drawn in favor of any teacher, unless the officer whose duty it is to draw the warrant is satisfied that the teacher has faithfully performed all the duties prescribed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45056.

Whenever a person is employed by two or more districts under the jurisdiction of a single county superintendent of schools, the governing boards of the districts may authorize, in writing, the county superintendent of schools to act as their agent in the payment of the salaries due such person from the districts. If such authorization is given, the county superintendent of schools may draw a warrant on the county school service fund in payment of the total salaries due such person and shall immediately draw requisitions in favor of the county school service fund against the proper funds of each district for the amount paid by him to such person on account of such district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45057.

The salary payment due a certificated employee for his last month of service in any district during any fiscal year shall not be approved by the county superintendent of schools until all reports required from the employee have been filed with the superintendent. Such payment shall be made within 10 calendar days after the filing of all such reports if after the regular payday or the last month of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

45058.

Whenever reports are required to be filed with the county superintendent of schools by certificated employees of districts authorized to issue warrants under the provision of Section 42647 and such reports have not been filed, the county superintendent of schools may direct the district in writing to withhold the salary payment due the certificated employee involved. Said payment should not be released to the certificated employee until directed in writing by the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45059.

For the purposes of Military and Veterans Code Section 395 or any other provision of law providing for the payment of salary or compensation as such employee to an employee of a school district while absent from duty because engaged in ordered military or naval duty, his salary or compensation as such employee for 30 days shall (a) with respect to an employee serving in a position requiring certification qualifications be deemed to be one-tenth of the annual salary established for such position and (b) with respect to an employee serving in a position not requiring certification qualifications be deemed to be one month’s salary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45060.

(a) Except as provided in Section 45061, the governing board of each public school employer, when drawing an order for the salary payment due to a certificated employee of the employer, shall reduce the order by the amount which it has been requested in a revocable written authorization by the employee to deduct for the purpose of paying the dues of the employee for membership in any local professional organization or in any statewide professional organization, or in any other professional organization affiliated or otherwise connected with a statewide professional organization which authorizes the statewide organization to receive membership dues on its behalf, or to deduct for the purpose of paying dues in, or for any other service, program, or committee provided or sponsored by, any
 certified or recognized employee organization, of which the employee is a bargaining unit member, whose membership consists, in whole or in part, of employees of the public school employer, and which has as one of its objectives improvements in the terms or conditions of employment for the advancement of the welfare of the employees. Any revocation of a written authorization shall be in writing and shall be effective provided the revocation complies with the terms of the written authorization.

(b) Unless otherwise provided in an agreement negotiated pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the governing board shall, no later than the 10th day of each pay period for certificated employees, draw its order upon the funds of the employer in favor of the organization designated by the employee for an amount equal to the total of the dues or other deductions made with respect to that
 organization for the previous pay period and shall transmit the total amount to that organization no later than the 15th day of each pay period for certificated employees. When timely transmittal of dues or other payments by a county is necessary for a public school employer to comply with the provisions of this section, the county shall act in a timely manner. The governing board may deduct from the amount transmitted to the organization on whose account the dues or other payments were deducted the actual reasonable costs of making the deduction.

(c) The revocable written authorization shall remain in effect until expressly revoked in writing by the employee, pursuant to the terms of the written authorization. Whenever there is a change in the amount required for the payment to the organization, the employee organization shall provide the employee with adequate and necessary data on the change at a time sufficiently prior to the effective date
 of the change to allow the employee an opportunity to revoke the written authorization, if desired and if permitted by the terms of the written authorization. The employee organization shall provide the public school employer with notification of the change at a time sufficiently prior to the effective date of the change to allow the employer an opportunity to make the necessary adjustments and with a copy of the notification of the change which has been sent to all concerned employees.

(d) The governing board shall not require the completion of a new deduction authorization when a dues or other change has been effected or at any other time without the express approval of the concerned employee organization.

(e) The governing board shall honor the terms of the employee’s written authorization for payroll deductions. Employee requests to cancel or change authorizations for payroll
 deductions for employee organizations shall be directed to the employee organization rather than to the governing board. The employee organization shall be responsible for processing these requests. The governing board shall rely on information provided by the employee organization regarding whether deductions for an employee organization were properly canceled or changed, and the employee organization shall indemnify the public school employer for any claims made by the employee for deductions made in reliance on that information.

(f) A certified or recognized employee organization that certifies that it has and will maintain individual employee authorizations shall not be required to submit to the governing board of a public school employer a copy of the employee’s written authorization in order for the payroll deductions described in this section to be effective, unless a dispute arises about the existence or terms of the written
 authorization. The employee organization shall indemnify the public school employer for any claims made by the employee for deductions made in reliance on its notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 53, Sec. 1.   (SB 866)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

45061.

The governing board of each school district when drawing an order for the salary or wage payment due to a certificated employee of the district shall, with or without charge, reduce the order for the payment of service fees to the certified or recognized organization as required by an organizational security arrangement between the exclusive representative and a public school employer as provided under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. However, the organizational security arrangement shall provide that any employee may pay service fees directly to the certified or recognized employee organization in lieu of having such service fees deducted from the salary or wage order.

If the employees of a district do not authorize the board to make a deduction to pay their pro rata share of the costs of making deductions for the payment of service fees to the certificated or recognized organization, the board shall deduct from the amount transmitted to the organization on whose account the payments were deducted the actual costs, if any, of making the deduction. No charge shall exceed the actual cost to the district of the deduction. These actual costs shall be determined by the board and shall include startup and ongoing costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1148, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

45061.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a school district that collects or deducts dues, agency fees, fair share fees, or any other fee or amount of money from the salary of a certificated employee for the purpose of transmitting the money to an employee organization shall transmit the money to the employee organization within 15 days of issuing the paycheck containing the deduction to the employee.

(b) (1) This section does not limit the right of an employee organization or affected employee to sue for a failure of the employer to transmit dues or fees pursuant to this section.

(2) In an action brought for a violation of subdivision (a), the court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party if any party to the action requests attorney fees and costs.

(c) A school district or county office of education may not request, and the State Board of Education may not grant, a waiver of compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Classified Employees [45100. - 45500.]



  ARTICLE 1. Employment [45100. - 45139.]

45100.
